California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(4) Emergency handling procedures for each hazardous material transported in or on the involved cars of the train.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 505.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Crimes [7676. - 7681.]

7676.

Every person who, in making up or running any railroad train, places or runs, or causes to be placed or run, any freight car in the rear of passenger cars, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and if loss of life or limb results from such placing or running, is guilty of a felony. This section shall not apply where railroad trains are carrying only personnel and equipment in connection with military or naval movements. “Freight car,” as used in this section, does not include a baggage, express, or mail car.

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1976.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 246, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

7677.

No person, firm, or corporation operating a railroad with more than four trains each way every 24 hours shall require or permit any engineer, fireman, conductor, brakeman, or trainman to receive, deliver, or transmit at any receiving or forwarding instrument of any telegraph or telephone line, any order for the movement of any train, except in such cases or classes of cases as are permitted by the commission. This section does not apply to interurban or street railroads. Any person, firm, or corporation violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7677.1.

Radio or other means of communication not hereinabove referred to in Section 7677 may be used for the purpose of transmitting orders for the movement of trains, subject to such rules or regulations as the commission may promulgate for insuring the safety of railroad operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1847.)
-------------------------------------------

7678.

Except as provided in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 7604, every person in charge of a locomotive engine who, before crossing any traveled public way, omits to cause a bell to ring or steam whistle, air siren, or air whistle to sound at the distance of at least 1,320 feet from the crossing, and until the lead locomotive has passed through the crossing, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 263, Sec. 3.   Effective August 30, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

7679.

Any person employed upon any railroad as engineer, conductor, baggage-master, brakeman, switchman, fireman, bridge-tender, flagman, or signalman, or having charge of the regulation or running of trains upon any railroad, in any manner whatever, who either becomes or is intoxicated or who is impaired due to the unlawful use of a controlled substance while engaged in the discharge of his duties, is guilty of a misdemeanor. If any person so employed does any act or neglects any duty, by reason of such intoxication or illegal drug use, which act or neglect causes the death of, or bodily injury to, any person or persons, that person so employed is guilty of a
 felony.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 631, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7680.

Every conductor, engineer, brakeman, switchman, or other person having charge, wholly or in part, of any railroad, car, locomotive, or train, who willfully or negligently suffers or causes it to collide with another car, locomotive, or train, or with any other object or thing whereby the death of a human being is produced, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of
 the Penal Code for two, three or four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 561.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

7681.

Every engineer, conductor, brakeman, switch-tender, or other officer, agent, or servant of any railroad company, who is guilty of any wilful violation or omission of his duty as such officer, agent, or servant, whereby human life or safety is endangered, the punishment of which is not otherwise prescribed, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Rail Service Assistance [7700. - 7705.]

7700.

By Section 803 of the Railroad Revitalization and Regulatory Reform Act of 1976, designated in this chapter as the “act,” Congress has established a local rail service continuation assistance program. Such program is designed to cover: the cost of rail service continuation payments; the cost of purchasing a line of railroad or other rail properties to maintain existing or provide for future rail service; the cost of rehabilitating and improving rail properties on a line of railroad to the extent necessary to permit adequate and efficient rail freight service on such line; and the cost of reducing the costs of lost rail service in a manner less expensive than continuing rail
 service. The Legislature hereby determines that such program should be implemented in California and that such implementation would constitute a public purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

7701.

The Department of Transportation, in cooperation with the commission and other affected state and local agencies, shall be responsible for the preparation and periodic update of the state rail plan required by the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

7702.

The Department of Transportation, in cooperation with the commission and other affected state and local agencies, shall perform the duties required by the act in developing, promoting, supervising, and supporting safe, adequate, and efficient rail transportation services; maintaining adequate programs of investigation, research, promotion, and development, with provisions for public participation; and shall take all practicable steps to improve transportation safety and to reduce transportation-related energy utilization and pollution. It is not the intent of this section to diminish in any respect the authority and responsibility of the commission. The department shall work
 in close cooperation with the commission in carrying out the duties imposed upon it under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

7703.

The Department of Transportation shall administer a program of projects for rail service assistance financed in whole or in part with funds derived pursuant to the act. All necessary matching funds shall be expressly appropriated by the Legislature or donated by public or private entities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

7704.

To the maximum extent permitted by federal law, rules, and regulations, the Department of Transportation shall recover the costs of administering this chapter from the federal funds received pursuant to the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------

7705.

The Governor, the Secretary of the Business and Transportation Agency, and the Department of Transportation may enter into such agreements, execute such documents, establish and manage such accounts and deposits, act as a recipient, and take any other action that may be appropriate to carry out the rail assistance programs authorized by the act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 819.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Railroad Safety and Emergency Planning and Response [7710. - 7727.]

7710.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Commission” shall mean the Public Utilities Commission.

(b) “Fund” means the Rail Accident Prevention and Response Fund created pursuant to Section 7713.

(c) “Prevention account” means the Hazardous Spill Prevention Account created, pursuant to Section 7714, in the Railroad Accident Prevention and Response Fund.

(d) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the California Environmental Protection Agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 618, Sec. 288.   (AB 2791)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

7711.1.

The commission shall collect and analyze near-miss data generated from incidents occurring at railroad crossings and along the rail right-of-way. For purposes of this section, “near-miss” includes a runaway train or any other uncontrolled train movement that threatens public health and safety reported to the commission pursuant to Section 7661.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 885, Sec. 6.   Effective September 30, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7712.

On or before January 1, 1993, the commission shall adopt regulations, based on its findings and not inconsistent with federal law. The commission may amend or revise the regulations as necessary thereafter, to reduce the potential railroad hazards identified in Section 916.2. In adopting the regulations, the commission shall consider at least all of the following:

(a) Establishing special railroad equipment standards for trains operated on railroad sites identified as posing a local safety hazard pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 916.2. These standards may include, but need not be limited to, standards for all of the following:

(1) Sizes, numbers, and configurations of locomotives.

(2) Brakes.

(b) Establishing special train operating standards for trains operated over railroad sites identified as posing a local safety hazard pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 916.2. These standards may include, but need not be limited to, standards for all of the following:

(1) Length, weight, and weight distribution of trains.

(2) Speeds and accelerations of trains.

(3) Hours of allowable travel.

(c) Establishing special training, personnel, and performance standards for operators of trains that travel on railroad sites identified as posing a local
 safety hazard pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 916.2.

(d) Establishing special inspection and reporting standards for trains operated on railroad sites identified as posing a local safety hazard pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 916.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 68.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

7713.

(a) The Rail Accident Prevention and Response Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, and the money in the fund is available for appropriation by the Legislature. The secretary shall administer the fund and the prevention account in accordance with this article, and shall develop and adopt regulations and guidelines necessary to carry out and enforce this article. 

(b) The State Board of Equalization shall implement the collection of the fee imposed pursuant to Section 7714.5 in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to Section 7713. 

(c) The adoption of regulations pursuant to this section shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as an emergency necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted by the secretary and the State Board of Equalization pursuant to this section shall be filed with, but not repealed by, the Office of Administrative Law, and shall remain in effect until revised or repealed by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7714.

(a) The Hazardous Spill Prevention Account in the Railroad Accident Prevention and Response Fund is hereby created. The moneys deposited in the prevention account shall be subject to annual appropriation in the Budget Act or other appropriation by the Legislature. The amount deposited in the prevention account and available for appropriation shall not exceed three million dollars ($3,000,000) in any calendar year. 

(b) The moneys in the prevention account may be expended by the secretary for any of the following purposes:

(1) Creation, support, and maintenance of the Railroad Accident Prevention and Immediate Deployment Force created by subdivision (a) of Section 7718. 

(2) Creation, support, maintenance, and implementation of the state railroad accident prevention and immediate deployment plan developed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 7718. 

(3) Creation, support, and maintenance of programs, data registries, equipment, and facilities to respond to, and contain, toxic releases resulting from surface transportation accidents. Expenditures pursuant to this paragraph may be for the purpose of any of the following: 

(A) Acquisition and maintenance of specialized equipment and supplies. 

(B) Support of
 specialized facilities. 

(C) Creation and support of a state-level and local toxic emergency response teams to provide immediate onsite response capability in the event of large scale releases of toxic substances resulting from surface transportation accidents. 

(4) Support for specialized training for state and local emergency response officials in techniques for prevention of, and response to, toxic releases resulting from surface transportation accidents. 

(5) Support for research, data collection, and studies into technologies and techniques for prevention of, response to, and mitigation of, toxic releases resulting from surface transportation accidents. 

(6) To provide economic assistance to persons, entities, and communities that suffer direct or
 indirect economic damages from a surface transportation accident.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7714.5.

(a) In accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to Section 7713, the secretary shall establish a fee schedule, which shall be paid by each surface transporter of hazardous materials in California in an amount sufficient to fund the appropriation from the prevention account and to maintain a prudent reserve of two months’ operating costs, less amounts transferred from the response account pursuant to subdivision (d). 

(b) The
 secretary shall, to the extent practicable, identify programs, equipment, and facilities applicable to specific surface transportation modes, and shall establish fees for each surface transportation mode to cover the costs of the programs, equipment, and facilities applicable to that specific surface transportation mode. Fees to cover the costs of programs, equipment, and facilities applicable to all or several surface transportation modes shall be paid in equal shares by surface transportation modes. 

(c) The secretary may authorize payment of fees through contributions in kind of equipment, materials, or services. 

(d) For the purposes of the fees authorized by this section, “surface transportation mode” shall not include pipelines subject to the fee assessed pursuant to Section 51019 of the Government Code or any natural gas pipeline. 

(e) This section shall become inoperative on December 31, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.   Inoperative December 31, 1995, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7718.

(a) The Railroad Accident Prevention and Immediate Deployment Force is hereby created in the California Environmental Protection Agency. The force shall be responsible for providing immediate onsite response capability in the event of large-scale releases of toxic materials resulting from surface transportation accidents and for implementing the state hazardous materials incident prevention and immediate deployment plan. This force shall act cooperatively and in concert with existing local emergency response units. The force shall consist of representatives of all of the following:

(1) Department of Fish and Game.

(2) California Environmental Protection Agency.

(3) State Air Resources Board.

(4) California Integrated Waste Management Board.

(5) California regional water quality control boards.

(6) Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(7) Department of Pesticide Regulation.

(8) Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment.

(9) State Department of Public Health.

(10) Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(11) Department of Food and Agriculture.

(12) Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(13) Department of Parks and Recreation.

(14) Public Utilities Commission.

(15) Any other potentially affected state, local, or federal agency.

(16) Office of Emergency Services.

(b) The California Environmental Protection Agency shall develop a state railroad accident prevention and immediate deployment plan in cooperation with the State Fire Marshal, affected businesses, and all of the entities listed
 in paragraphs (1) to (17), inclusive, of subdivision (a).

(c) The plan specified in subdivision (b) shall be a comprehensive set of policies and directions that every potentially affected state agency and business shall follow if there is a railroad accident to minimize the potential damage to the public health and safety, property, and the environment that might result from accidents involving railroad activities in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 506.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

7720.

(a) (1) When an appropriate prosecuting agency determines that any person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in, any acts or practices which constitute, or which shall constitute, a violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, permit, covenant, standard, requirement, or order issued, promulgated, or executed pursuant to this chapter, the city attorney or district attorney of the jurisdiction in which these acts or practices have occurred, are occurring, or shall occur, or the Attorney General, may make application to the superior court or to the commission for an order
 enjoining these acts or practices or an order directing compliance with this chapter. 

(2) A temporary restraining order, preliminary or permanent injunction, or other order may be issued under this subdivision upon a showing that any person has engaged in, is engaging in, or is about to engage in, the acts or practices set forth in paragraph (1). 

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any civil action brought pursuant to this chapter in which a temporary restraining order, or preliminary or permanent injunction is sought, it shall not be necessary for the moving party to allege or prove either of the factors set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) at any stage of the proceeding. The temporary restraining order or preliminary or permanent injunction may issue without allegations or proof of either of the following factors: 

(1) That irreparable damage shall occur should the relief sought not be granted. 

(2) That the remedy at law is inadequate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7721.

Every civil action commenced pursuant to this article for civil or criminal penalties authorized by this article shall be brought by the city attorney, the district attorney, or the Attorney General in the name of the people of the State of California, and any actions relating to the same event, transaction, or occurrence may be joined or consolidated, or may be coordinated pursuant to Section 404 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Division II (commencing with Rule 1501) of Title Four of the California Rules of Court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7722.

Any civil action brought in the superior court pursuant to this article shall be brought in the county in which the spill, discharge, or violation occurred, the county in which the principal place of business of the defendant is located, or the county in which the defendant is doing business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7723.

The civil and criminal penalties provided in this article are separate and in addition to, and do not supersede or limit, any other civil or criminal remedy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7724.

(a) Any person who commits any of the following acts, shall, upon conviction, be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for 16, 24, or 36 months:

(1) Except as provided by Section 7724.1, knowingly
 fails to follow the direction or order of the secretary or the commission arising from a rail accident or release of a hazardous or potentially hazardous commodity from a railcar.

(2) Knowingly causes, or aids or abets in, the discharge or spill of, a hazardous or potentially hazardous commodity from a railcar, unless the discharge is authorized by the United States, the state, or another agency with appropriate jurisdiction.

(3) Knowingly fails to comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 7712, and that failure results in a rail accident or release of hazardous material or creates a significant risk of accident or release of hazardous material.

(b) The court shall also impose upon a person convicted of violating subdivision (a), a fine not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for each
 violation. For purposes of this subdivision, each day or partial day that a violation occurs is a separate violation.

(c) The court shall also impose upon a person convicted of violating paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a fine equal to twice the cost of abating, repairing, and responding to the cost associated with the illegal discharge of a hazardous or potentially hazardous commodity from a railcar as a result of a rail accident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 562.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

7724.1.

(a) If a person reasonably, and in good faith, believes that the directions or orders given by the secretary or the commission would substantially endanger the public safety or the environment, the person may refuse to act in compliance with the orders or directions of the secretary or the commission. The person shall state, at the time of the refusal, the reasons why the person refuses to follow the orders or directions of the secretary or the commission. The person shall give the secretary or the commission written notice of the reasons for the refusal within 48 hours of refusing to follow the orders or directions of the secretary
 or the commission. 

(b) In any civil or criminal proceeding commenced pursuant to Section 7724, the burden of proof shall be on the responsible party or potentially responsible party to demonstrate, by clear and convincing evidence, why the refusal to follow the orders or directions of the secretary or the commission was justified under the circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7724.5.

(a) Any person who commits any of the acts set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation of a separate provision or, for a continuing violation, for each day that violation occurs:

(1) Negligent failure to follow the direction or order of the secretary in connection with a rail accident or the release of a hazardous commodity from a railcar. 

(2) Knowingly engaging in, or causing the discharge or
 spill of a hazardous commodity from a railcar or highway carrier, unless that discharge is authorized by the United States, by the state, or by another governmental agency with appropriate jurisdiction. 

(3) Negligent failure to comply with any regulation adopted pursuant to Section 7712. 

(b) Any person who commits any of the acts set forth in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation of a separate provision or, for a continuing violation, for each day that violation occurs: 

(1) Failure to follow the direction or order of the secretary in connection with a rail accident or the release of a hazardous commodity from a railcar. 

(2) Engaging in, or causing
 the discharge or spill of a hazardous commodity from a railcar or highway carrier, unless that discharge is authorized by the United States, by the state, or by another governmental agency with appropriate jurisdiction. 

(3) Failure to comply with any regulation adopted pursuant to Section 7712.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7725.

Twenty-five percent of penalties and fines collected pursuant to any action brought under Sections 7724 and 7724.5 shall be paid to the governmental agency or office which prosecutes the action. The remainder of the penalties and fines collected pursuant to this article shall be deposited into the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7726.

(a) When the secretary or the commission determines that any person has engaged in, is engaged in, or threatens to engage in, any practice or act which constitutes a violation of this article, or any regulation or order issued, adopted, or executed pursuant to this article, the secretary or commission may issue an order requiring that person to cease and desist. 

(b) Any cease and desist order issued by the secretary or commission may be subject to such terms and conditions as the secretary or commission may determine are necessary to ensure compliance with this article.
 

(c) Any cease and desist order issued by the secretary or commission shall become null and void 90 days after issuance. 

(d) A cease and desist order issued by the secretary or commission shall be effective upon the issuance thereof, and copies shall be served immediately by certified mail upon the person or governmental agency being charged with the actual or threatened violation. 

(e) The commission may authorize its executive director to exercise the commission’s authority to issue cease and desist orders pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

7727.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter shall not be construed to make a reference to the California Environmental Protection Agency for the purposes of compliance with Provision 2 of Item 3400-002-044 of Section 2. 00 of the Budget Act of 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 766, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Street Railroads [7801. - 7818.]

7801.

Street railroads are governed by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 7501), so far as it is applicable, unless street railroads are therein specially excepted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 172.)
-------------------------------------------

7802.

When a street railroad is constructed, owned, or operated by any natural person, this chapter is applicable to such person in like manner as it is applicable to corporations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7803.

Any street railroad or any street railway corporation may sell, lease, convey, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its property and assets, including franchises, under authority of a resolution of its board of directors and with the approval of the principal terms of the transaction and the nature and the amount of the consideration by a vote or written consent of shareholders entitled to exercise a majority of the voting power of the corporation when the sale, lease, conveyance, exchange or transfer of its properties is made to a municipal corporation or any other political subdivision within the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7804.

Authority to lay railroad tracks through the streets and public highways of any city or city and county may be obtained for a term of years not exceeding 50, from the governing body of the city or city and county, under such restrictions and limitations, and upon such terms and payment of license tax, as the governing body may provide. Permission shall not be granted to propel cars upon such tracks otherwise than by electricity or by wire ropes running under the streets and moved by stationary engines except as provided in Section 7813. The governing body in granting the right, or at any time after the right is granted, may impose such terms, restrictions, and limitations as
 to the use of streets and the construction and mode of operating the road as it deems to be for the public safety or welfare.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7805.

The city governing body, in granting the right of way to a street railroad corporation, in addition to the restrictions which they are authorized to impose, shall require a strict compliance with the following conditions, except in the cases of prismoidal or other elevated railways:

(a) The railway shall be constructed in such manner as will present the least obstruction to the freedom of the streets on which it is erected.

(b) The tracks shall not be more than five feet wide within the rails, and shall have a space between them sufficient to
 allow the cars to pass each other freely.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7806.

The legislative body of any city or city and county may permit two or more lines of street railway to use the same portion of the same street or the same tracks upon such terms as are agreed upon by the companies operating the railways, but no permission shall be granted to one company to use the same tracks or portions of the same street for more than five consecutive blocks, without the consent of the person or company occupying that portion of the street and then only upon payment of an equal portion of the cost of construction of the tracks and appurtenances used by the railways jointly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7807.

Where the portion of the street is occupied by a track or tracks of a different gauge from the track or tracks proposed to be constructed thereon by a line of street railway under a different management, the latter street railway may nevertheless construct its track or tracks, subject to the provisions of Section 7806, over the same ground as is occupied by the prior track or tracks, if they can be so constructed as not to interfere with the operation of the prior track or tracks beyond such necessary interference therewith as is incident to such construction with reasonable skill, care, and diligence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7808.

Any city or city and county may own and operate street railways within or without its corporate limits and may occupy the same street or tracks occupied or used by any street railway within its limits for any number of blocks, upon payment to the owner thereof of an equal portion of the estimated cost of construction, at the time of such occupation, of such tracks or appurtenances as the city or city and county elects to use jointly with the street railway.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7809.

Any proposed railroad track may be permitted to cross any track already constructed, the crossing being made as provided in Chapter 1 of this division. In laying down the track and preparing therefor, not more than one block shall be obstructed at any one time, nor for a longer period than 10 working days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7810.

Street railway cars shall be of the most approved construction for the comfort and convenience of passengers, and provided with brakes to stop them, when required. A violation of this section subjects the corporation to a fine of two hundred dollars ($200) for each offense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 360.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

7811.

Cities in or through which street railroads run may make such further regulations for the government of the street railroads as may be necessary to a full enjoyment of the franchise and the enforcement of the conditions provided herein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7812.

In every grant to construct street railroads, the right to grade, sewer, pave, macadamize, or otherwise improve, alter, or repair the streets or highways, is reserved to the city and cannot be alienated or impaired. The work shall be done so as to obstruct the railroad as little as possible, and if required, the street railway corporation shall shift its rails so as to avoid the obstructions made thereby.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7813.

The right to lay down a track for grading purposes and to maintain it for a period not to exceed three years may be granted by the governing body of any city, city and county, or county, but no such track shall remain more than three years upon any one street. The track shall be laid level with the street, and shall be operated under such restrictions as not to interfere with the use of the street by the public. The governing body may grant the right to use steam or any other motive power in propelling the cars used on the grading track, when public convenience or utility demands it, but the reasons therefor shall be set forth in the ordinance, and the right to rescind the
 ordinance at any time reserved.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7814.

Any corporation, or agent or employee thereof, demanding or charging a greater sum of money for fare on the cars of a street railroad than that fixed by law forfeits to the person from whom the sum is received, or who is thus overcharged, the sum of two hundred dollars ($200), to be recovered in a civil action against the corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 78.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7815.

Every street railroad corporation shall provide, and on request furnish to all persons desiring a passage on its cars, any required quantity of passenger tickets or checks, each to be good for one ride. Any corporation failing to provide and furnish tickets or checks to any person desiring to purchase them at the prescribed rate shall forfeit to such person the sum of two hundred dollars ($200), to be recovered as provided in Section 7814. The provisions of this section shall not apply to such street railroad corporations as charge but five cents ($0.05) fare.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7816.

Upon the trial of an action for any of the sums forfeited, as provided in Sections 7814 or 7815, proof that the person demanding or receiving the money as fare, or for the sale of the ticket or check, was at the time of making the demand or receiving the money, engaged in an office of the corporation, or vehicle belonging to the corporation, shall be prima facie evidence that such person was the agent, servant, or employee of the corporation, to receive the money, and give the ticket or check mentioned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7817.

Any street railroad corporation operating cars on the streets of cities or on the county roads within the State for the conveyance of passengers, propelled by means of wire ropes attached to stationary engines, or by electricity or compressed air, who runs, operates, or uses any car or dummy, unless each car and dummy, while in use, is fitted with a brake capable of bringing the car to a stop within a reasonable distance, and a suitable fender, or appliance placed in front or attached to the trucks of the dummy, or car, for the purpose of removing and clearing obstructions from the track, and preventing any obstacles, obstructions, or person on the track from getting under
 the dummy or car, and removing the same out of danger, and out of the way of the dummy or car, is guilty of a misdemeanor. Where the commission prescribes the fender or brake to be used, a compliance therewith constitutes a full compliance with this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7818.

Any person operating or driving a street car who becomes or is intoxicated while so engaged in operating or driving such street car is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Telegraph or Telephone Corporations [7901. - 7912.]

7901.

Telegraph or telephone corporations may construct lines of telegraph or telephone lines along and upon any public road or highway, along or across any of the waters or lands within this State, and may erect poles, posts, piers, or abutments for supporting the insulators, wires, and other necessary fixtures of their lines, in such manner and at such points as not to incommode the public use of the road or highway or interrupt the navigation of the waters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

7901.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, consistent with Section 7901, that municipalities shall have the right to exercise reasonable control as to the time, place, and manner in which roads, highways, and waterways are accessed.

(b) The control, to be reasonable, shall, at a minimum, be applied to all entities in an equivalent manner.

(c) Nothing in this section shall add to or subtract from any existing
 authority with respect to the imposition of fees by municipalities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

7903.

Every agent, operator, or employee of any telegraph or telephone office, who in any way uses or appropriates any information derived by him from any private message passing through his hands, and addressed to any other person, or in any other manner acquired by him by reason of his trust as such agent, operator, or employee, or trades or speculates upon any such information so obtained, or in any
 manner turns, or attempts to turn, the information so obtained to his own account, profit, or advantage, is punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding one year, or by fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.
